Tennessee statutes. Title 70 Wildlife Resources
Part 1

Hunting and Fishing

70-4-101. Ownership and title to wildlife vested in the state.

The ownership of and title to all forms of wildlife within the jurisdiction of the state that are not individual property under the laws of the land are hereby declared to be in the state. No wildlife shall be taken or killed in any manner or at any time, except the person or persons so taking or killing the wildlife shall consent that the title to the wildlife shall be and shall remain in the state for the possession, use and transportation of the wildlife after such taking or killing as set forth in this chapter.

The taking or killing of any and all forms of wildlife at any time, in any manner, and by any person, shall be deemed a consent on the part of such person that the title to such wildlife shall be and shall remain in the state for the purpose of regulating the possession, use, sale and transportation of the wildlife for the public welfare.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 1 (Williams, § 5178.30); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-401.

Cross-References. General assembly empowered to protect game and fish, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 13.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Fish and Fisheries, § 1.

70-4-102. Illegal taking, possession or destruction of wildlife — Penalty for violations.

It is unlawful for any person to hunt, kill, trap, ensnare, or destroy, or to attempt to hunt, kill, trap, ensnare, or destroy, or to have in such person's possession, any form of wildlife except subject to the restrictions and by the means and devices and at the time prescribed by this title.

Any violations of the proclamations and rules and regulations proclaimed by the fish and wildlife commission are punishable as provided in this title, and the illegal taking or possession of each bird, animal or fish constitutes a separate offense.

A violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, §§ 1, 4 (Williams, §§ 5178.30, 5178.33); Acts 1961, ch. 198, § 2; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; 1982, ch. 738, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-405, 51-412; Acts 1998, ch. 909, § 1; 2003, ch. 61, § 2; 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2003, ch. 61, § 2 purported to amend (c); however, Acts 1998, ch. 909, § 1 made the changes enacted by ch. 61. The codified provisions reflect the provisions of both ch. 61 and ch. 909.

Cross-References. General assembly empowered to protect game and fish, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 13.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Tennessee's wildlife agency has the authority to enforce its laws relating to the taking and possession of fish in the Mississippi River against Tennessee residents, regardless of whatever nonresident licenses Tennessee fishermen may hold, OAG 04-003, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 5 (1/07/04).

If the Tennessee wildlife resources agency (TWRA), or its predecessor, has entered into a reciprocal license agreement with another state to recognize each other's respective fishing and hunting licenses on a shared body of water, TWRA cannot enforce its statutes and proclamations regulating the supply of fish in those waters against Tennessee residents using valid nonresident licenses from the adjacent state in question; amending OAG 04-003, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 5 (1/07/04), OAG 04-047, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (3/19/04).

70-4-103. Fox hunting — Training of hunting dogs — Penalty.

Foxes may be chased with dogs the entire year, except during such periods as may be fixed by the fish and wildlife commission for the protection of the species.

Notwithstanding any private act to the contrary, the commission shall have the authority to regulate the taking or killing of foxes in this state.

Any person who hunts and kills a fox in a manner other than as permitted by this subsection (a) commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Fox hounds, rabbit dogs and bird dogs may be trained the entire year, except during such periods as may be fixed by the commission for the protection of the species, but any person accompanying the dogs or training them shall not possess any firearm, bow and arrow, or any other such device, except during the regular open season.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 31; 1953, ch. 145, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1953, ch. 198 (Williams, § 5178.60); Acts 1957, ch. 382, § 2; 1974, ch. 481, § 21; 1978, ch. 792, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-403; Acts 1985, ch. 331, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2012, ch. 993, § 13; 2015, ch. 235, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of geographically specific wildlife provisions, OAG 98-036, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 36 (2/9/98).

70-4-104. Catching or killing fish — Fishing regulations.

Fish may be taken with rod and reel, by hook and line held in the hand while fishing, or by one (1) or more trotlines not having a combination of more than one hundred (100) hooks, which trotline shall be attended at least once each day. Use or possession of any other instrument for the killing, catching, or taking of fish or other aquatic life is expressly forbidden, except as provided for in this title or as permitted by regulations made under authority granted the fish and wildlife commission under this title.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 19 (Williams, § 5178.48); Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; 1982, ch. 738, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-404; Acts 1996, ch. 677, § 1; 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Cross-References. Taking fish caught by another, penalty, § 39-14-206.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Fish and Fisheries, § 1.

70-4-105. Lawful possession of wildlife by legal license holders.

Wild animals, wild birds, or wild fowl lawfully taken may be possessed by legal license holders during any open season for their lawful taking, designated pursuant to the terms of § 70-4-107(b)-(d), but no person shall have in possession or in storage, or both, during any open season or at any other time, more than the possession limit prescribed by the fish and wildlife commission.

Any person violating this section commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1941, ch. 127, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.35 (Williams, § 5176.22); modified; Acts 1959, ch. 126, § 1; 1961, ch. 198, § 2; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-406; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-4-106. Permission of owner of land to take wildlife or big game required — Penalty for violations.

It is unlawful for any person to hunt, take, chase, trap or kill any wild animal, wild bird, wild fowl or fish, upon the land of another without having first obtained the permission or approval of the owners of the land, or of the person or persons in charge of the land and having authority from the owner to give such permission.

A violation of this subsection (a) is a Class C misdemeanor. Upon conviction for any violation of this subsection (a), the court may revoke the license of the person so convicted. Any license so revoked shall be surrendered to the court and transmitted to the arresting officer, to be made a part of the prosecution record.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), it is unlawful for any person to hunt, take, chase, trap or kill any game as defined in § 70-1-101 upon lands posted with signs approved by the wildlife resources agency bearing the language “Hunting By Written Permission Only” and bearing the name of the landowner or the person in possession or control of such lands, without having first obtained the written permission of or being accompanied by the landowner or the person in possession or control of such lands and having authority from the owner to give such permission. Every person who hunts, takes, chases, traps or kills any game on such lands shall have such written permission in immediate possession at all times and shall display the same upon demand of an officer of the wildlife resources agency, sheriff or other peace officer charged with the enforcement of the laws of this state. Written permission shall not be required of the landowner, the landowner's dependents, the person in possession or control of such lands, or the dependents of the person in possession or control of such lands.

The signs posted pursuant to this subsection (b) must be posted by either of the following methods:

The signs must be visible at all major points of ingress of the lands being posted, in such manner that the signs are reasonably likely to come to the attention of intruders; or

The signs must be visible at all major points of ingress and must be accompanied by fluorescent visual markings, which markings must also be placed at fifty-yard (50 yd) intervals around the perimeter of the lands being posted. Such fluorescent visual markings must be at least one inch (1") wide and four inches (4") long. The division of forestry, in cooperation with the department of agriculture and the wildlife resources agency, shall determine a unique universal paint color or colors, including the color blue, to be used for these property boundary markings.

Any person who posts signs pursuant to this subsection (b) without authorization from the landowner is subject to the penalties imposed by subdivision (b)(2).

A violation of this subsection (b) is a Class C misdemeanor. Upon conviction for any violation of this subsection (b), the court may revoke the license of the person convicted. Any license so revoked shall be surrendered to the court.

This subsection (b) is enforceable and may be prosecuted by all officers of the wildlife resources agency, sheriffs and other peace officers charged with the enforcement of the laws of this state.

An affidavit from the landowner or the person in possession or control of such lands stating that the property on which the violation occurred was properly posted in accordance with this section shall create an inference that such lands were properly posted.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 51 (Williams, § 5178.80); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-407; Acts 1988, ch. 542, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 569, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1995, ch. 145, § 1; 2004, ch. 748, § 1; 2010, ch. 1143, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Game and Game Laws, § 3.

70-4-107. Hunting and fishing seasons — Bag and creel limits — Nonprotected wildlife.

There is hereby declared a closed season upon all hunting and fishing in this state upon all wildlife protected by the laws of the state.

Whenever the supply of game or fish, or both, existing in any area, lake or stream shall become adequate to allow the taking or hunting, or both, of the game or fish without material danger of extinction or undue depletion of such game or fish, then it is lawful for any person to hunt or fish, or both, in the area, lake or stream within the creel, size, and bag limits, and in the manner and by the means prescribed by the fish and wildlife commission.

The fact as to whether or not the supply of game or fish, or both, is at any time adequate to allow the taking of game or fish without the danger of extinction or undue depletion shall be determined by the commission, after a complete survey of the area in question.

If the commission finds that the supply of game or fish, or both, is sufficient to allow taking without the danger of extinction or undue depletion, it shall announce such fact by proclamation, in which it shall state the species of the game or fish, or both, that may be taken without the danger as mentioned in this section, and shall likewise ascertain and announce the dates and hours of the day between which such game or fish, or both, may be taken without the dangers set forth. Upon such announcement by the commission, it is lawful for any person within the area so designated by the commission to take game or fish, or both, of the species mentioned by the commission.

The proclamations shall become effective thirty (30) days after filing with the secretary of state. During emergency conditions, seasons may be closed, reopened or extended summarily. A copy of all proclamations issued by the commission shall be immediately filed with the secretary of state and the county clerks for the counties affected.

The commission shall annually publish a list of such wildlife as are deemed destructive or not to be protected by law, or both.

During any such open season as promulgated by the commission, the provisions of all general game and fish laws shall remain in full force and effect with reference to the method and manner of hunting and fishing and all other restrictions and provisions as to the taking of wild animals and fish as now or hereafter appear in the general game and fish laws.

The open season on private lakes may be set by the owner and operator thereof, but the creel limits on fish caught from the waters of such lakes shall not exceed that set by law for public waters.

The commission may establish open seasons, bag and creel limits for the taking of game and fish on state lands, including lands leased by the state for wildlife management purposes, and may make any regulations it may deem needful to promote the best interest and enforce these provisions by means of rules and directions.

A violation of this subsection (f) is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, §§ 2-4, 27, 53 (Williams, §§ 5178.31-5178.33, 5178.56, 5178.82, 5178.85); Acts 1953, ch. 255, § 4; 1955, ch. 152, § 1; 1974, ch. 481, § 21; 1978, ch. 587, § 2; 1979, ch. 39, § 1; 1982, ch. 738, §§ 13, 14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-408 — 51-410, 51-413, 51-414; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 981, § 3; 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1982, ch. 738, § 13 provided:

“This section or any section of the bill will not abolish any present private act of any Tennessee county now in existence pertaining to wildlife regulations of that county.”

The penalty provided in this section was changed to a Class C misdemeanor by Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113. However, Acts 1990, ch. 981 provided that notwithstanding the provisions of ch. 591, § 113, a violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Cross-References. General assembly empowered to protect game and fish, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 13.

Hunting and fishing license required to transport protected game and fish out of the state, § 70-4-203

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Game and Game Laws, § 3.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339.

Attorney General Opinions. Municipality unable to prohibit state authorized hunting, OAG 98-038, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 38 (2/9/98).

70-4-108. Hunting from or across public road or near dwelling — Penalty.

It is unlawful to hunt, shoot at, chase, catch, or kill, with or without dogs, any wild animal, wild bird, or wild fowl from a public road right-of-way, or to shoot any firearms across or on any public road.

It is unlawful to hunt, shoot at, chase, or kill, with or without dogs any wild animal, wild bird or wild fowl on public lands and waters within one hundred yards (100 yds.) of a visible dwelling house, whether or not such dwelling house is on public or private lands, without the owner's permission.

A violation of subsection (a) or (b) is a Class C misdemeanor.

It is unlawful to hunt, shoot at, chase, catch, or kill, with or without dogs, any wild animal, wild bird, or wild fowl from a motor vehicle on either a public road or right-of-way, or from a public road or right-of-way after leaving a motor vehicle specifically for such purpose with the immediate intent to return to the vehicle.

A violation of this subsection (d) is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 35 (Williams, § 5178.64); Acts 1979, ch. 254, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-415; Acts 1983, ch. 280, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 670, § 1; 1984, ch. 898, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2005, ch. 124, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. General assembly empowered to protect game and fish, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 13.

Penalties for Class A and Class C misdemeanors, § 40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. The distance and permission requirements of T.C.A. § 70-4-108(b) do not apply to individuals hunting on private property. OAG 10-102, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 104 (10/1/10).

70-4-109. Hunting from aircraft, watercraft or motor vehicles unlawful — Exception for persons confined to wheelchairs — Penalty.

It is unlawful to chase, hunt, or kill any wild birds, wild animals or wild fowl in this state from any craft propelled by electric, gasoline, steam or sail power, or airplane or hydroplane or from any automobile or motor vehicle, unless otherwise provided by law, rule and regulation or by proclamation; provided, that under no circumstance shall this subsection (a) be construed as authorizing the legalization of hunting from an automobile or motor vehicle while under power.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), any person totally and permanently confined to a wheelchair as certified by appropriate documentation to the executive director may hunt or kill any wildlife from a stationary automobile or motor vehicle during the lawful hunting seasons; provided, that it is unlawful for such person to shoot directly across or over any road, path or other right-of-way; and provided further, that any such persons shall be accompanied by another person who is not so confined at all times when hunting, and that such person shall retrieve all game taken in such hunt.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 36 (Williams, § 5178.65); 1979, ch. 237, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-416; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2005, ch. 109, § 1.

Cross-References. General assembly empowered to protect game and fish, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 13.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Unlawful possession of weapon, § 39-17-1307.

70-4-110. Spotlighting deer — Penalty.

It is unlawful for any person, or one (1) or more of a group of persons together, to willfully throw or cast, or cause to be thrown or cast, the rays of a spotlight, headlight, or other artificial light from any motor vehicle or vessel or with the aid of any motor vehicle or vessel, on or from any highway, or in any field, woodland, or forest, or the waters of the state, in an apparent attempt or intent to locate deer by the use of such light, unless such person or persons direct such light onto property owned by such person or one of the persons involved, or such person or group of persons has written permission from the landowner to willfully throw or cast, or cause to be thrown or cast, the rays of a spotlight, headlight, or other artificial light onto the property of the landowner. Such written permission must be in immediate possession at all times and the individual shall display same upon demand of law enforcement.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), it is unlawful to willfully throw or cast, or cause to be thrown or cast, the rays of a spotlight, headlight, or other artificial light from any motor vehicle or vessel or with the aid of any motor vehicle or vessel, at any time from or on any public roadway.

The operator of any motor vehicle or vessel from which the rays of an artificial light have been cast as outlined in subsection (a) shall immediately stop such vehicle or vessel upon the direction of any enforcement officer of the wildlife resources agency.

A violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

In the prosecution of second or subsequent offenders, the indictment or presentment must allege the prior conviction for violating any of the provisions of this section, setting forth the time and place of each such prior conviction. The court shall prohibit such convicted person, either first or subsequent offenders, from hunting, fishing or trapping in this state for a period of one (1) year.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 47 (Williams, § 5178.76); Acts 1961, ch. 198, § 3; 1967, ch. 278, §§ 1, 2; 1974, ch. 481, § 21; 1974, ch. 498, § 1; 1974, ch. 499, § 1; 1974, ch. 703, § 1; 1976, ch. 456, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 620, § 1; 1976, ch. 667, § 1; 1976, ch. 681, § 1; 1982, ch. 701, §§ 1-6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-417, 51-429; Acts 1983, ch. 385, § 3; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 981, § 3; 2011, ch. 191, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The penalty provided in this section was changed to a Class C misdemeanor by Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113. However, Acts 1990, ch. 981 provided that notwithstanding the provisions of ch. 591, § 113, a violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Cross-References. General assembly empowered to protect game and fish, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 13.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-4-111. Hunting or killing any big game during closed season — Penalty.

Any person who hunts or kills any big game during the closed season for such game commits a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1943, ch. 103, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.35 (Williams, § 5176.22); Acts 1957, ch. 382, § 3; 1982, ch. 738, § 16; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-419; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 981, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The penalty provided in this section was changed to a Class C misdemeanor by Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113. However, Acts 1990, ch. 981 provided that notwithstanding the provisions of ch. 591, § 113, a violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-4-112. Hunting and chasing coons regulated — Training season — Violations — Penalties.

It is lawful for any person to chase coons with dogs at any season of the year, but no coon shall be killed or taken except during open season for killing or taking of coons, as may be prescribed by the fish and wildlife commission or other body possessing the power to regulate open and closed seasons for game. No person chasing coons with dogs shall use or carry any firearms, axes or climbing instruments except during such open season as may be proclaimed as set forth in this subdivision (a)(1). No coon shall be shot at any time in the year either from a boat or any type of motor vehicle.

Notwithstanding this section, this part or any public or private act to the contrary, in Morgan County and in counties that are located entirely east of U. S. Highway 27, the commission shall establish a minimum training season of not less than six (6) months each year, within which period coon dogs may be trained. Such coon dog training season shall not commence earlier than June 1 of each year. Such six-month period need not be consecutive. Within such training season, no person chasing coons with dogs shall use or carry any firearms, axes or climbing instruments except during such open season as may be proclaimed pursuant to this section. No coon shall be killed or taken except during such open season. No coon shall be shot at any time in the year either from a boat or any type of motor vehicle. The commission shall establish a minimum coon hunting season of not less than six (6) weeks each year, which season shall not commence sooner than November 1 of each year. Such six-week period need not be consecutive. The commission has the authority to extend both the training season or hunting season, or both, to such additional periods of time as it deems justified based on the coon population in the area involved in any section or sections of the state.

To the extent that this subdivision (a)(2) conflicts with § 70-4-122, any public act or any private act, this subdivision (a)(2) controls and shall supersede such laws.

Any person violating this section commits a Class C misdemeanor, and, in addition to the penalties prescribed by § 40-35-111 for Class C misdemeanors, is prohibited from hunting, chasing, or trapping for a period of not less than one (1) year.

Acts 1953, ch. 198, § 1 (Williams, § 5178.70a); modified; Acts 1965, ch. 318, § 1; Private Acts of 1967, ch. 25, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 174, §§ 1, 3; 1974, ch. 411, § 1; 1974, ch. 481, § 21; 1980, ch. 555, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-420; Acts 1983, ch. 465, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 564, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2012, ch. 644, § 1; 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Cross-References. Coon dog training, § 70-4-122.

General assembly empowered to protect game and fish, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 13.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-4-113. Use of bait, pitfalls and certain other devices in taking birds and animals prohibited — Penalty — Exceptions.

It is unlawful for any person at any time to make use of any pitfall, deadfall, cage, snare, trap, net, baited hooks, poison, chemicals, explosives, set guns, spotlights, electric lights or torches, bait, which includes any grain, or mixture of any ingredients, used as or for food purposes, or other devices for the purpose of killing, injuring, or capturing any birds or animals protected by the wildlife laws of this state, except as otherwise expressly provided.

The executive director or the executive director's designees may use any chemical, biological substance, poison or device under controlled conditions to capture or kill any bird or animal for scientific, propagating, enforcement, humane or rescue purposes or when it is considered necessary by the executive director to reduce or control any species that may be detrimental to human safety, health or property. No action on the part of the executive director, directed to the control of rabies or other diseases spread from wildlife to human beings, shall be taken until the following conditions have been met:

The county board of health in the affected county shall have met in open session and, by appropriate resolution, declared that a condition detrimental to the human safety, health or property exists within the affected county;

An official quarantine by the county board of health has been established on all dogs, cats and pets in the county; and

An official request has been made by the county board of health, through and with the concurrence of the commissioner of health, to the executive director to take such action as is necessary by the executive director or the executive director's designees and by such means as are authorized in this section to bring the disease under control in the affected county. This subsection (b) is effective in every county in this state.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor; provided, that spot, electric or torch lights may be used in the hunting and taking of raccoons, opossums and frogs, and box traps may be used for the taking of rabbits during the open shooting season for the same.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 37 (Williams, § 5178.66); Acts 1957, ch. 382, § 4; 1965, ch. 43, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7; Acts 1982, ch. 738, § 17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-421; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 891, § 12.

Cross-References. General assembly empowered to protect game and fish, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 13.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-4-114. Destruction of dens or nests — Spotlighting — Use of spears, explosives, chemicals or other devices unlawful — Penalty.

It is unlawful to disturb, mutilate, or destroy the home, nest, or den of any protected wild animals or birds, to use spears or any like device in the hunting or taking of protected wild animals, to blind with lights, except as provided in § 70-4-113, or to use explosives, chemicals, mechanical devices, or smokers of any kind to drive protected wild animals out of their dens, holes, or houses.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 38 (Williams, § 5178.67); impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; 1982, ch. 738, § 18; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-423; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. General assembly empowered to protect game and fish, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 13.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-4-115. Destruction and disposal of wildlife — Permit — Penalty.

The owner of lands may destroy any wild animals, wild birds, or wild fowl when such wild animals, wild birds, or wild fowl are destroying property upon such lands. Any person, before destroying any big game under the conditions provided for in this section, is required to obtain a permit for destroying such big game. Such permit shall be issued by an officer of the wildlife resources agency.

Any big game killed or destroyed under the conditions provided for in this section shall remain the property of this state and may be disposed of by the officer of the commission by gift to any worthy recipient; provided, that any wild birds or wild animals killed accidentally or illegally shall be disposed of in the same manner and a receipt for the same obtained from the person or agency receiving such game.

Motorists are not required to report game accidentally killed by the operation of a motor vehicle. Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary, wild animals accidentally killed by a motor vehicle may be possessed by any person for personal use and consumption; except that, first, personal possession of a deer accidentally killed by a motor vehicle is permitted only if the person notifies the wildlife resources agency or any law enforcement officer within a reasonable time not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours and supplies that person's name and address; and second, personal possession of a bear accidentally killed by a motor vehicle is permitted only when authorized by an enforcement officer of the wildlife resources agency and the person is issued a kill tag. In deer-kill notification situations where a law enforcement officer rather than someone with the wildlife resources agency is notified, the law enforcement officer or the officer's designee shall be responsible for notifying someone with the wildlife resources agency and supplying the information relevant to the deer-kill. Nothing in this section authorizes possession of federally protected wildlife or wildlife protected by the state under chapter 8 of this title.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 33 (Williams, § 5178.62); 1959, ch. 145, § 4; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; 1979, ch. 193, § 1; 1982, ch. 738, § 19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-424; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 891, § 13; 1999, ch. 285, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-4-116. Hunting, killing and possession of deer, bear, wild elk and wild turkey — Transporting — Tagging — Penalties.

Notwithstanding any law or any public or private act to the contrary, it is unlawful for any person to hunt or take deer, bear or wild elk with any shotgun using ammunition loaded with more than one (1) solid ball or rifled slug, or with any rifle using rim-fire cartridges. Bows and arrows are prohibited except as prescribed by the fish and wildlife commission.

It is unlawful to hunt, pursue, capture, possess, transport or store any deer, wild turkey, bear or wild elk either male or female, in this state, at any time or in any area other than at times and within the area designated by the commission in its promulgation of open seasons, as provided by this title.

Subsections (a)-(c) do not apply when such deer, wild turkey, bear or wild elk has been killed outside the boundaries of this state. Possession of such game in any closed season or boundary, except as provided in subsection (e), is prima facie evidence of guilt under this section. Any person found in possession of a deer, wild turkey, bear or wild elk and claiming that it was killed outside the state shall present to the executive director, or to any court hearing a cause pursuant to this title, sufficient proof to establish that the animal was so killed.

Any person killing or possessing, or both, a deer, wild turkey, bear or wild elk shall tag the animal in accordance with procedures set out in the proclamation. Any deer, wild turkey, bear or wild elk that has not been tagged in accordance with this chapter or any proclamation promulgated in accordance with this title may be confiscated and disposed of as provided by law.

The commission is authorized to issue special quota harvest tags for certain species, or sexes of species, requiring limited harvest. The commission is authorized to adopt rules and regulations that would permit granting to landowners special consideration in the issuance of special quota harvest tags.

A violation of this subsection (d) is a Class C misdemeanor.

A violation of subsections (a)-(c) is a Class B misdemeanor except that a violation of any of these subsections relative to wild elk shall be a Class A misdemeanor. It is mandatory upon the court to impose the prison sentence, upon conviction for a second or subsequent offense, and the prison sentence is not subject to suspension.

In the prosecution of second or subsequent offenders, the indictment or presentment must allege the prior conviction for violating any of the provisions of subsections (a)-(c), setting forth the time and place of each such prior conviction. The court shall prohibit such convicted person, either a first or subsequent offender, from hunting, fishing or trapping in this state for a period of one (1) year.

In addition to the punishments authorized by this title, any court that convicts a person of killing or possessing a white-tailed deer, wild turkey, bear, or wild elk in violation of this title may order that person to pay restitution for the animal to the agency in the following amount:

Not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per animal, for each of the following that is illegally killed or possessed:

Wild turkey;

White-tailed deer with no antlers; and

Antlered white-tailed deer with less than eight (8) antler points;

Not less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per animal, for each of the following that is illegally killed or possessed:

Wild elk with no antlers; and

Antlered wild elk with less than eight (8) antler points;

Not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per animal plus five hundred dollars ($500) per antler point, for each antlered white-tailed deer with at least eight (8) but not more than ten (10) antler points that is illegally killed or possessed;

Not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per animal plus seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) per antler point, for each antlered white-tailed deer with eleven (11) or more antler points that is illegally killed or possessed;

Not less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per animal plus five hundred dollars ($500) per antler point, for each antlered wild elk with at least eight (8) but not more than ten (10) antler points that is illegally killed or possessed;

Not less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per animal plus seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) per antler point, for each antlered wild elk with eleven (11) or more antler points that is illegally killed or possessed; and

Not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per animal, for each bear that is illegally killed or possessed and for each bear cub that is orphaned by the illegal killing or possession of a bear.

If the conviction is based on the killing or possession of a wild elk and the court orders restitution pursuant to subdivision (f)(1), in addition to any other relevant factors to consider when determining the amount of restitution, the court shall also include the costs associated with the reintroduction of a wild elk.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a farmland owner, lessee, or designee may take an elk found within a “no elk zone” when the owner, lessee, or designee reasonably believes the elk is causing or has caused damage to the owner's property. In all other situations, the farmland owner, lessee, or designee shall first provide the agency an opportunity to relocate the elk. The “no elk zone” shall be defined by the commission.

In addition to the punishments authorized by this title, any court that convicts a person of killing or possessing a white-tailed deer, wild turkey, bear, or wild elk in violation of this section shall revoke any license that was issued to the person under this title until the person has paid in full all restitution that the court ordered the person to pay.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, §§ 42, 43, 47; 1953, ch. 226, § 3 (Williams, §§ 5178.71, 5178.72, 5178.76); Acts 1957, ch. 382, § 6; 1957, ch. 384, § 1; 1959, ch. 145, § 4; 1961, ch. 198, §§ 2, 3; 1970, ch. 597, § 1; 1973, ch. 288, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; 1975, ch. 244, § 1; 1976, ch. 681, § 1; 1978, ch. 626, § 1; 1979, ch. 198, § 1; 1980, ch. 644, § 1; 1982, ch. 701, §§ 4-6; 1982, ch. 738, § 20; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-425, 51-426, 51-429; Acts 1983, ch. 385, § 4; 1984, ch. 551, § 1; 1985, ch. 310, § 1; 1988, ch. 592, §§ 1-3; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 891, § 14; 1990, ch. 981, § 3; 1999, ch. 91, § 1; 2001, ch. 103, §§ 1-4; 2006, ch. 615, § 1; 2008, ch. 715, § 1; 2011, ch. 283, §§ 2-5; 2012, ch. 993, § 13; 2015, ch. 370, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The penalty provided in this section was changed to a Class C misdemeanor on November 1, 1989, by Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113. However, Acts 1990, ch. 981, § 3 provided that, notwithstanding the provisions of ch. 591, § 113, a violation under subsection (e) of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 2011, ch. 283, § 7 provided that the commission is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act, which amended subsections (a)-(d). All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2015, ch. 370, § 2 provided that the act, which amended (f) and (g), shall apply to all offenses that are committed on or after July 1, 2015.

Cross-References. Penalties for Class A, Class B or Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law and Procedure — 1960 Tennessee Survey (Robert E. Kendrick), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1059.